Massachusetts, session 194th, S2914.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “or”, in line 563, the following 
words:- the expiration of 1 year after.  
SECTION 2. Said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the word “or”, in line 569, the following words:- the expiration of 1 
year after. 
SECTION 3. Section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing is hereby further amended by 
striking out, in line 1077, the word “ten” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 7. 
SECTION 4. Subclause (2) of clause Forty-first A of said section 5 of said chapter 59, as 
so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place 
thereof the following sentence:- Any city or town may also, by vote of its legislative body, adopt 
a higher maximum qualifying gross receipts amount for the purposes of this clause; provided, 

of 2 13 however, that such maximum qualifying gross receipts amount shall not exceed the amount of 
income determined by the commissioner of revenue for the purposes of subsection (k) of section 
6 of chapter 62. 
SECTION 5. Said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the word “or”, in line 1261, the following words:- the expiration of 1 
year after. 
SECTION 6. Said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the word “or”, in line 1267, the following words:- the expiration of 1 
year after.